Illinois, session 104th, SB2890.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Volunteer Emergency Worker Job Protection 5Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 748/5)7    Sec. 5. Volunteer emergency worker; when termination of 8employment prohibited. 9    (a) No public or private employer may terminate an 10employee who is a volunteer emergency worker because the 11employee, when acting as a volunteer emergency worker, is 12absent from or late to his or her employment in order to 13respond to an emergency prior to the time the employee is to 14report to his or her place of employment. 15    (a-5) A public or private employer shall not discipline an 16employee who is a volunteer emergency worker if the employee, 17in the scope of acting as a volunteer emergency worker, 18responds to an emergency phone call or text message during 19work hours that requests the person's volunteer emergency 20services. This subsection (a-5) does not apply to a person 21employed by a public or private vehicle service provider and 22who is in the course of performing services as Emergency 23Medical Services personnel as defined in Section 3.5 of the   SB2890- 2 -LRB104 18606 SPS 32049 b1Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. This subsection 2(a-5) shall not diminish or supersede an employer's written 3workplace policy, a collective bargaining agreement, 4administrative guidelines, or other applicable written rules 5administered by the employer. Existing written policies 6governing the use of cell phones shall prevail and control. 7    (b) An employer may charge, against the employee's regular 8pay, any time that an employee who is a volunteer emergency 9worker loses from employment because of the employee's 10response to an emergency in the course of performing his or her 11duties as a volunteer emergency worker. 12    (c) In the case of an employee who is a volunteer emergency 13worker and who loses time from his or her employment in order 14to respond to an emergency in the course of performing his or 15her duties as a volunteer emergency worker, the employer has 16the right to request the employee to provide the employer with 17a written statement from the supervisor or acting supervisor 18of the volunteer fire department or governmental entity that 19the volunteer emergency worker serves stating that the 20employee responded to an emergency and stating the time and 21date of the emergency. 22    (d) An employee who is a volunteer emergency worker and 23who may be absent from or late to his or her employment in 24order to respond to an emergency in the course of performing 25his or her duties as a volunteer emergency worker must make a 26reasonable effort to notify his or her employer that he or she   SB2890- 3 -LRB104 18606 SPS 32049 b1may be absent or late. 2    (e) In the case of an employee who is deployed to a 3disaster area as a volunteer emergency worker, the employer 4shall, upon the return of the employee, restore the employee 5to a position of similar seniority, status, and pay in which 6the employee would have been employed if the continuous 7employment of the employee had not been interrupted.8(Source: P.A. 100-324, eff. 1-1-18.)